Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2702
Appearances; representation; attorney; qualification.

No person shall appear in the county court to represent another, or act as attorney therein for any person other than himself or herself, unless he or she is regularly admitted as an attorney in this state.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. I, § 14, p. 282;

C.S.1929, § 22-114;

R.S.1943, § 26-115;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 85;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-585.